Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202050-1507
Election contest; qualifications challenge; respondent's rights; decision against member; effect.

When an election contest or qualifications challenge is pending pursuant to the Legislative Qualifications and Election Contests Act, the respondent member may qualify and take office at the time specified by law and exercise the duties of the office until the election contest or qualifications challenge is decided. If the election contest or qualifications challenge is decided against such member, the Legislature shall order him or her to give up the office to the petitioner in the election contest or qualifications challenge and deliver to the petitioner all books, records, papers, property, and effects pertaining to the office. The Legislature may enforce such order by attachment or other proper legal process.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 14.